Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.100

City manager—Appointment of subordinates—Qualifications—Terms.

Appointments made by or under the authority of the city manager shall be on the basis of executive and administrative ability and of the training and experience of the appointees in the work which they are to perform. Residence within the city or town shall not be a requirement. All such appointments shall be without definite term.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.100. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 8; prior: 1949 c 84 s 2, part; 1943 c 271 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-26, part.]